Utah statutes.
53A-24-110.5.   Assistive Technology Advisory Council -- Membership --
Duties.
(1)  The State Board of Education, through the State Office of Rehabilitation,
shall utilize the Rehabilitation Services Advisory Committee as an advisory
council for the Center for Assistive Technology, an interagency service unit
which assists Utahns with disabilities.
(2)  The council shall advise and make recommendations to the executive
director of the State Office of Rehabilitation on the programs and
administration of the center that would:
(a)  be interagency in nature;
(b)  address the needs of all people with disabilities; and
(c)  be consumer responsive.
